Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2065.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; housing infrastructure and rehabilitation The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to the city of Apache Junction for the following purposes: 1. $6,500,000 to fund affordable housing infrastructure. 2. $3,000,000 for housing rehabilitation and blight abatement.